Massachusetts, session 194th, S2366.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a special commission on micro-transit to study existing and emerging
micro-transit services in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and funding to: (i) benchmark
different types of micro-transit operating models, including those operated by a regional transit
authority and those operated by other entities, various types of micro-transit services, and
populations dependent upon these services; (ii) assess funding sources and current limitations or
outstanding funding needs related to offering micro-transit services in regions across the
Commonwealth; and (iii) define micro-transit services for the purposes of determining eligibility
for state funding; (iv) estimate annual state funding needed to support existing and emerging
micro-transit services across the Commonwealth and propose a mechanism and frequency for
reassessing such state funding estimate to account for changes in micro-transit needs and
opportunities in the future; and (v) to explore micro-transit as a way to close mobility gaps,
enhance connectivity across existing transit services, and address inequities in transportation
of 3

access for certain geographies and populations. The commission shall consist of the following
members or their designees: the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on transportation
who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 member of the house of representatives, who shall be appointed
by the minority leader of the house of representatives; 1 member of the senate, who shall be
appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 2 persons to be appointed by the Massachusetts
Association of Regional Transit Authorities, both of whom shall be former or current
administrators of a regional transit authority and 1 of whom represents a regional transit
authority that serves rural communities and 1 of whom represents a regional transit authority that
has offered micro-transit services; 1 person to be appointed by the Massachusetts Statewide
Independent Living Council; 1 person representing the rail and transit division of the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation; 2 persons representing existing or emerging micro-
transit service operated by an entity that is not a regional transit authority; 1 person representing
the Massachusetts Department of Transportation Mobility Assistance Program; 1 person
representing the Rural Policy Advocacy Commission; 1 person representing the Massachusetts
Public Health Association; 1 person representing Transportation for Massachusetts; 1 person
representing the Massachusetts Councils on Aging; and 2 persons to be appointed by the
governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a municipality sponsoring or operating a micro-
transit service and 1 of whom shall be a representative of a health care organization whose
patients and employees are served by micro-transit.
The commission shall file a final report of its study and recommendations with the clerks
of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means,
the joint committee on transportation and the secretary of transportation not later than 15 months
of 3

after this section takes effect; provided, however, that the commission may make a draft report
available to the public for comment before filing its final report.
of 3